Illinois, session 104th, HB4451.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Official Safety and Privacy Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 347/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Public Official Safety and Privacy Act.9(Source: P.A. 104-443, eff. 1-1-26.)